Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.705

Fall prevention program.

Within funds appropriated for this purpose, the department shall develop a statewide fall prevention program. The program shall include networking community services, identifying service gaps, making affordable senior-based, evaluated exercise programs more available, providing consumer education to older adults, their adult children, and the community at large, and conducting professional education on fall risk identification and reduction.

[ 2008 c 146 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—2008 c 146: See notes following RCW 74.41.040.